Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-201, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-201. A. Pursuant to the provisions of this


section, a child may be taken into custody prior to the filing of a


petition:


1. By a peace officer or employee of the court, without a court


order if the officer or employee has reasonable suspicion that:


a. the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat,



Req. No. 3397 Page 1


b. the circumstances or surroundings of the child are


such that continuation in the child’s home or in the


care or custody of the parent, legal guardian, or


custodian would present an imminent safety threat to


the child, or


c. the child, including a child with a disability, is


unable to communicate effectively about abuse, neglect


or other safety threat or is in a vulnerable position


due to the inability to communicate effectively and


the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat; or


2. By an order of the district court issued upon the


application of the office of the district attorney. The application


presented by the district attorney may be supported by a sworn


affidavit which may be based upon information and belief. The


application shall state facts sufficient to demonstrate to the court


that a continuation of the child in the home or with the caretaker


of the child is contrary to the child’s welfare and there is


reasonable suspicion that:


a. the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat,


b. the circumstances or surroundings of the child are


such that continuation in the child’s home or in the


care or custody of the parent, legal guardian, or

Req. No. 3397 Page 2


custodian would present an imminent safety threat to


the child, or


c. the child, including a child with a disability, is


unable to communicate effectively about abuse, neglect


or other safety threat or is in a vulnerable position


due to the inability to communicate effectively and


the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat.


The application and order may be verbal and upon being advised by


the district attorney or the court of the verbal order, law


enforcement shall act on such order. If verbal, the district


attorney shall submit a written application and proposed order to


the district court within one (1) judicial day from the issuance of


the verbal order. If a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the


child is represented by counsel and such representation is known to


the state, the state shall notify the counsel prior to presenting a


request for an emergency order and provide a reasonable opportunity


to appear. Any affidavit provided under this section shall include


a sworn statement as to representation. Upon approval, the


application and order shall be filed with the court clerk; or


3. By order of the district court when the child is in need of


medical or behavioral health treatment in order to protect the


health, safety, or welfare of the child and the parent, legal


guardian, or custodian of the child is unwilling or unavailable to

Req. No. 3397 Page 3


consent to such medical or behavioral health treatment or other


action, the court shall specifically include in the emergency order


authorization for such medical or behavioral health evaluation or


treatment as it deems necessary.


B. 1. By January 1, 2010, the Department in consultation with


law enforcement and the district courts shall develop and implement


a system for joint response when a child is taken into protective


custody by a peace officer pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A


of this section. The system shall include:


a. designation of persons to serve as contact points for


peace officers, including at least one backup contact


for each initial contact point,


b. a protocol for conducting a safety evaluation at the


scene where protective custody is assumed to determine


whether the child faces an imminent safety threat and,


if so, whether the child can be protected through


placement with relatives or others without the


Department assuming emergency custody,


c. the development of reception centers for accepting


protective custody of children from peace officers


when the Department is unable to respond at the scene


within a reasonable time period,


d. a protocol for conducting a safety evaluation at the


reception center within twenty-three (23) hours of the

Req. No. 3397 Page 4


assumption of protective custody of a child to


determine whether the child faces an imminent safety


threat and, if so, whether the child can be protected


through placement with relatives or others without the


Department assuming emergency custody, and


e. a protocol, when the child cannot safely be left in


the home, for transporting a child to the home of a


relative, kinship care home, an emergency foster care


home, a shelter, or any other site at which the


Department believes the child can be protected,


provided that the Department shall utilize a shelter


only when the home of a relative, kinship care home,


or emergency foster care home is unavailable or


inappropriate.


2. Beginning January 1, 2010, no child taken into protective


custody under paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section shall be


considered to be in the emergency custody of the Department until


the Department has completed a safety evaluation and has concluded


that the child faces an imminent safety threat and the court has


issued an order for emergency custody.


3. If the safety evaluation performed by the Department of a


child taken into protective custody under paragraph 1 of subsection


A of this section indicates that the child does not face an imminent


safety threat, the Department shall restore the child to the custody

Req. No. 3397 Page 5


and control of the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the


child.


C. When an order issued by the district court pursuant to


subsection A of this section places the child in the emergency


custody of the Department of Human Services pending further hearing


specified by Section 1-4-203 of this title, an employee of the


Department may execute such order and physically take the child into


custody in the following limited circumstance:


1. The child is located in a hospital, school, or day care


facility; and


2. It is believed that assumption of the custody of the child


from the facility can occur without risk to the child or the


employee of the Department.


Otherwise, the order shall be executed and the child taken into


custody by a peace officer or employee of the court.


D. The court shall not enter a prepetition emergency custody


order removing a child from the home of the child unless the court


makes a determination:


1. That an imminent safety threat exists and continuation in


the home of the child is contrary to the welfare of the child; and


2. Whether reasonable efforts have been made to prevent the


removal of the child from the child’s home; or


3. An absence of efforts to prevent the removal of the child


from the home of the child is reasonable because the removal is due

Req. No. 3397 Page 6


to an emergency and is for the purpose of providing for the safety


and welfare of the child.


E. Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this


section:


1. The child may be taken to a kinship care home or an


emergency foster care home designated by the Department, or if no


such home is available, to a children’s shelter located within the


county where protective or emergency custody is assumed or, if there


is no children’s shelter within the county, to a children’s shelter


designated by the court;


2. Unless otherwise provided by administrative order entered


pursuant to subsection F of this section, the child may be taken


before a judge of the district court or the court may be contacted


verbally for the purpose of obtaining an order for emergency


custody. The court may place the child in the emergency custody of


the Department or some other suitable person or entity pending


further hearing specified by Section 1-4-203 of this title;


3. The child may be taken directly to or retained in a health


care facility for medical treatment, when the child is in need of


emergency medical treatment to maintain the child’s health, or as


otherwise directed by the court; or


4. The child may be taken directly to or retained in a


behavioral health treatment facility for evaluation or inpatient


treatment, in accordance with the provisions of the Inpatient Mental

Req. No. 3397 Page 7


Health and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act, when the child


is in need of behavioral health care to preserve the child’s health,


or as otherwise directed by the court; and


5. Unless otherwise provided by administrative order entered


pursuant to subsection F of this section, the district court of the


county where the custody is assumed shall be immediately notified,


verbally or in writing, that the child has been taken into custody.


If notification is verbal, written notification shall be sent to the


district court within one (1) judicial day of such verbal


notification.


F. The court may provide, in an administrative order issued


pursuant to this section, for the disposition of children taken into


custody and notification of the assumption of such custody.


1. Such order or rule shall be consistent with the provisions


of subsection E of this section and may include a process for


release of a child prior to an emergency custody hearing. The


administrative order shall not include a provision to modify


protective custody of a child to emergency custody of the Department


upon admission of a child to a shelter; and


2. The administrative order may require joint training of peace


officers and Department staff deemed necessary by the court to carry


out the provisions of the administrative order.





Req. No. 3397 Page 8


G. No child taken into custody pursuant to this section shall


be confined in any jail, adult lockup, or adult or juvenile


detention facility.


H. When a determination is made by the Department that there is


a significant risk of abuse or neglect, but there is not an imminent


safety threat to the child, the Department may recommend a court-


supervised and Department-monitored in-home placement. The


Department shall assist the family in obtaining the services


necessary to maintain the in-home care and correct the conditions


leading to the risk determination.


I. Any peace officer, employee of the court, or employee of the


Department is authorized to transport a child when acting pursuant


to this section. Such persons and any other person acting under the


direction of the court, who in good faith transports any child or


carries out duties pursuant to this section, shall be immune from


civil or criminal liability that may result by reason of such act.


For purposes of any proceedings, civil or criminal, the good faith


of any such person shall be presumed. This provision shall not


apply to damage or injury caused by the willful, wanton or gross


negligence or misconduct of a person.


J. A parent or person responsible for the child who is arrested


on a charge or warrant other than child abuse or neglect or an act


of child endangerment may designate another person to take physical



Req. No. 3397 Page 9


custody of the child. Upon this request, the peace officer may


release the child to the physical custody of the designated person.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3397 BLB 1/14/2026 2:50:17 PM







































Req. No. 3397 Page 10